Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.22.260

Promotional contests of chance—Director's authority.

(1) If approved by its board of directors, a financial institution may conduct a promotional contest of chance as permitted under RCW 9.46.0356(1)(b).

(2) A financial institution must not conduct a savings promotional contest of chance, if, in the opinion of the director:

(a) It is likely to or does adversely affect the financial institution's safety and soundness;

(b) It is administered in an unsafe and unsound or imprudent manner, or in a manner that is likely to or does result in actual or potential reputational harm to the financial institution; or

(c) It is likely to or has misled the financial institution's members, depositors, or the general public.

(3) The director may examine the conduct of a promotional contest of chance pursuant to his or her supervisory and examination powers under:

(a) *Title 30 RCW, in regard to a bank;

(b) Title 32 RCW, in regard to a mutual or stock savings bank; or

(c) Chapter 31.12 RCW, in regard to a state credit union.

(4) The director may exercise his or her full enforcement powers under the titles and chapter in subsection (3) of this section and may issue a cease and desist order for a violation of this section.

(5) A financial institution must maintain records sufficient to facilitate an audit of a promotional contest of chance, and must provide those records to the director upon request.

[ 2011 c 303 s 5. Formerly RCW 30.22.260.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Title 30 RCW was recodified and/or repealed pursuant to chapter 37, Laws of 2014, effective January 5, 2015.

Findings—Intent—2011 c 303: See note following RCW 9.46.0356.